Maryland, session 2026, HB0948.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–213.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC
SCHOOL MAY NOT USE A GRADING RUBRIC IN WHICH 50 REPRESENTS THE LOWEST
SCORE POSSIBLE.
(B) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY USE A GRADING RUBRIC IN WHICH 50
REPRESENTS THE LOWEST SCORE POSSIBLE FOR STUDENTS WHO REQUIRE SPECIAL
EDUCATION SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0948*

HOUSE BILL 948